Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB367.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1908-B of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1902.1-B. CONTRACTING AUTHORITY MEMBERSHIP.(A) BOARD OF DIRECTORS.--THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM OF OFFICE OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223 BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY SHALL EXPIRE AND ALL SEATS SHALL BE CONSIDERED VACANT. A CONTRACTING AUTHORITY SHALL HAVE A BOARD OF DIRECTORS CONSISTING OF NINE MEMBERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING:(1) THREE MEMBERS SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE MAYOR OF THE CITY AS FOLLOWS:(I) THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF THREE YEARS.(II) THE SECOND MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FOUR YEARS.(III) THE THIRD MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FIVE YEARS.(2) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE STATE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE 22ND DISTRICT. THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FOUR YEARS.(3) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE STATE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE 132ND DISTRICT. THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FOUR YEARS.(4) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE STATE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE 134TH DISTRICT. THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FOUR YEARS.(5) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE STATE SENATOR OF THE 14TH DISTRICT. THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FIVE YEARS.(6) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE STATE SENATOR OF THE 16TH DISTRICT. THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF FIVE YEARS.(7) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED WITH THE CONCURRENCE OF THE STATE SENATORS OF THE 14TH AND 16TH DISTRICTS. THE FIRST MEMBER APPOINTED SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF THREE 20250SB0367PN0748 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 YEARS.(B) TERMS, VACANCY AND COMPENSATION.--TERMS OF MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY SHALL COMMENCE UPON THE DATE OF APPOINTMENT AND, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (A), CONCLUDE AFTER FIVE YEARS. MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS MAY BE REAPPOINTED FOR FIVE-YEAR TERMS UPON THE EXPIRATION OF A TERM. UNLESS REAPPOINTED, A MEMBER WHOSE TERM HAS EXPIRED SHALL CEASE TO BE A MEMBER AND THE SEAT SHALL BE CONSIDERED VACANT. A VACANCY ON THE BOARD SHALL BE FILLED BY THE SAME APPOINTING AUTHORITY AS THE INITIAL APPOINTMENT. CURRENTLY SERVING MEMBERS OR EMPLOYEES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL NOT BE ELIGIBLE FOR APPOINTMENT TO THE BOARD. MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SHALL SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION. MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SHALL BE CONSIDERED PUBLIC OFFICIALS OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR PURPOSES OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 4, 1978 (P.L.883, NO.170), REFERRED TO AS THE PUBLIC OFFICIAL AND EMPLOYEE ETHICS LAW.SECTION 2. SECTION 1908-B OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:Section 1908-B. Confidentiality.Notwithstanding any law providing for the confidentiality of tax records, the contracting authority and the local taxing authorities shall have access to any reports and certifications filed under this article, and the contracting authority shall have access to any State or local tax information, including taxpayer identification numbers of a qualified business located in the neighborhood improvement zone, filed by a qualified business in the neighborhood improvement zone solely for the purpose of documenting the certifications required by this article or determining the amount allocated to any uses specified under section 1904-B(e)(1). The independent auditing 20250SB0367PN0748 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 firm hired under section 1904-B(h) shall have access to any State or local tax information filed by a qualified business located in the neighborhood improvement zone, including taxpayer identification numbers, solely for the purpose of performing an audit required by section 1904-B(h). Any other use of the tax information shall be prohibited as provided under law.SECTION 3. ALL ACTIVITIES INITIATED BY THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY IN EXISTENCE ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AND MAY BE COMPLETED BY THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED 30 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION. CONTRACTS, OBLIGATIONS AND COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS ENTERED INTO BY THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY IN EXISTENCE ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION ARE NOT AFFECTED NOR IMPAIRED BY THE EXPIRATION OF THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY IN EXISTENCE ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 2 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0367PN0748 - 4 - <--<--12345678910111213141516